Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-14,141
Digital and electronic filing; procedures.

The commission may adopt procedures for the digital and electronic filing of any report or statement required by the Nebraska Political Accountability and Disclosure Act. Any procedures for digital filing shall comply with the provisions of section 86-611. The commission may adopt authentication procedures to be used as a verification process for statements or reports filed digitally or electronically. Compliance with authentication procedures adopted by the commission shall have the same validity as a signature on any report, statement, or verification statement.

Laws 1999, LB 581, § 3;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 438.